Utah statutes.
63J-1-702.   Purpose of review -- Information submitted.

The purpose of an in-depth budget review is to determine whether each department, agency, institution, or program warrants continuation of its current level of expenditure or at a different level, or if it should be terminated.  The budget for a state department, agency, institution, or program subject to an in-depth budget review shall be a detailed plan in which programs and activities within programs are organized and budgeted after analysis and evaluation are made of all proposed expenditures.  In the presentation of the budget of a department, agency, institution, or program subject to in-depth budget review, the governor shall include the following:

(1)  a statement of agency and program objectives, effectiveness measures, and program size indicators;

(2)  alternative funding levels for each program with effectiveness measures and program size indicators detailed for each alternative funding level.  Alternative funding levels shall be determined as percentages of the appropriations level authorized by the Legislature for the current fiscal year.  The percentages shall be determined for each in-depth budget review by the director of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget in consultation with the legislative fiscal analyst;

(3)  a priority ranking of all programs and activities in successively increasing levels of performance and funding;

(4)  other budgetary information requested by the legislative fiscal analyst; and

(5)  a statement containing further recommendations of the governor as appropriate.

